New Jersey, session 221, S2607.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. Each private entity that operates motorbus regular route service, as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-3), or portions or functions thereof, shall: (1)  provide at least four months written notice to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission and the New Jersey Transit Corporation prior to the substantial curtailment, as that term is defined in section 8 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-8), of such service; (2)  provide at least three months written notice to the services customers prior to the substantial curtailment of such service; and (3)  hold at least one public meeting in the affected area, as close as possible to the highest trafficked stop on the route, within 15 days after providing notice to the services customers pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.  Prior to holding the public meeting, the private entity shall provide written notice of the public meeting to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, the New Jersey Transit Corporation, as well as the State legislators representing any legislative district, the mayor and governing body of any municipality, and the board of county commissioners of any county that will be affected by the substantial curtailment of such service. b.   A private entity that is determined to be in violation of subsection a. of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each violation, in addition to any penalties that may be available pursuant to law. c.   The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section and shall take any action necessary to ensure that private entities are in compliance with the provisions of subsection a. of this section. d.   Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit the New Jersey Transit Corporation or any other instrumentality of the State that provides funds or compensation to a private entity from conditioning participation in any program, receipt of funds, or entry into a contractual agreement on adherence to the notice and public meeting requirements provided in this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.